Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 4. Procedures; Inspections; Orders; Penalties;
Representation by Attorney General.

§ 32.1-24.
Applicability of Administrative Process Act.

The provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) shall govern the procedures for rendering all case decisions, as defined in §

2.2-4001

, and issuing all orders and regulations under the provisions of this Code administered by the Board, the Commissioner or the Department unless exempt from the Administrative Process Act.

History.

1979, c. 711.

Law Review.

For annual survey of Virginia law article, “Administrative Law,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 7 (2012).

§ 32.1-25.
Right of entry to inspect, etc.; warrants.

Upon presentation of appropriate credentials and upon consent of the owner or custodian, the Commissioner or his designee shall have the right to enter at any reasonable time onto any property to inspect, investigate, evaluate, conduct tests or take samples for testing as he reasonably deems necessary in order to determine compliance with the provisions of any law administered by the Board, Commissioner or Department, any regulations of the Board, any order of the Board or Commissioner or any conditions in a permit, license or certificate issued by the Board or Commissioner. This right of entry shall not apply to privileged communications pursuant to §

8.01-581.17

. If the Commissioner or his designee is denied entry, he may apply to an appropriate circuit court for an inspection warrant authorizing such investigation, evaluation, inspection, testing or taking of samples for testing as provided in Chapter 24 (§

19.2-393

et seq.) of Title 19.2.

History.

1979, c. 711; 1998, c. 772.

§ 32.1-26.
Orders; hearing and notice.

The Board is authorized to issue orders to require any person to comply with the provisions of any law administered by it, the Commissioner or the Department or any regulations promulgated by the Board or to comply with any case decision, as defined in §

2.2-4001

, of the Board or Commissioner. Any such order shall be issued only after a hearing with at least thirty days’ notice to the affected person of the time, place and purpose thereof. Such order shall become effective not less than fifteen days after mailing a copy thereof by certified mail to the last known address of such person. The provisions of this section shall not affect the authority of the Board to issue separate orders and regulations to meet any emergency as provided in §

32.1-13

.

History.

1979, c. 711.

§ 32.1-27.
Penalties, injunctions, civil penalties and charges for violations.

Any person willfully violating or refusing, failing or neglecting to comply with any regulation or order of the Board or Commissioner or any provision of this title shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor unless a different penalty is specified.

Any person violating or failing, neglecting, or refusing to obey any lawful regulation or order of the Board or Commissioner or any provision of this title may be compelled in a proceeding instituted in an appropriate court by the Board or Commissioner to obey such regulation, order or provision of this title and to comply therewith by injunction, mandamus, or other appropriate remedy or, pursuant to §

32.1-27.1

, imposition of a civil penalty or appointment of a receiver.

Without limiting the remedies which may be obtained in subsection B of this section, any person violating or failing, neglecting or refusing to obey any injunction, mandamus or other remedy obtained pursuant to subsection B shall be subject, in the discretion of the court, to a civil penalty not to exceed $25,000 for each violation, which shall be paid to the general fund, except that civil penalties for environmental pollution shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Water Supply Assistance Grant Fund created pursuant to §

32.1-171.2

. Each day of violation shall constitute a separate offense.

With the consent of any person who has violated or failed, neglected or refused to obey any regulation or order of the Board or Commissioner or any provision of this title, the Board may provide, in an order issued by the Board against such person, for the payment of civil charges for past violations in specific sums, not to exceed the limits specified in §

32.1-27.1

and subsection C of this section. Such civil charges shall be instead of any appropriate civil penalty which could be imposed under §

32.1-27.1

and subsection C of this section. When civil charges are based upon environmental pollution, the civil charges shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Water Supply Assistance Grant Fund created pursuant to §

32.1-171.2

.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 32-6.4, 32-15; 1975, c. 564; 1976, c. 623; 1979, c. 711; 1980, c. 378; 1989, c. 618; 1999, c. 786; 2003, cc. 753, 762.

Cross references.

For additional civil penalty relating specifically to the statewide cancer registry, see §

32.1-71.01

.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2003, cc. 753 and
762, cl. 3, provide: “That the provisions concerning reinstatement in effect prior to July 1, 2003, shall apply to individuals who have had their licenses revoked by a health regulatory board prior to the effective date of this act. Every license revoked after the effective date of this act shall be subject to all of the provisions of this act.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 753 and 762 are identical, and substituted “$25,000” for “$10,000” in the first sentence of subsection D.

Law Review.

For annual survey article discussing the state of health care law in Virginia, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 137 (2003).

§ 32.1-27.1.
Additional civil penalty or appointment of a receiver.

In addition to the remedies provided in §

32.1-27

, the civil penalties set forth in this section may be imposed by the circuit court for the city or county in which the facility is located as follows:

A civil penalty for a Class I violation shall not exceed the lesser of $25 per licensed or certified bed or $1,000 for each day the facility is in violation, beginning on the date the facility was first notified of the violation.

A civil penalty for a Class II violation shall not exceed the lesser of $5 per licensed or certified bed or $250 per day for each day the facility is in violation, beginning on the date the facility was first notified of the violation.In the event federal law or regulations require a civil penalty in excess of the amounts set forth above for Class I or Class II violations, then the lowest amounts required by such federal law or regulations shall become the maximum civil penalties under this section. The date of notification under this section shall be deemed to be the date of receipt by the facility of written notice of the alleged Class I or Class II violation, which notice shall include specifics of the violation charged and which notice shall be hand delivered or sent by overnight express mail or by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested.All civil penalties received pursuant to this subsection shall be paid into a special fund of the Department for the cost of implementation of this section, to be applied to the protection of the health or property of residents or patients of facilities that the Commissioner or the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services finds in violation, including payment for the costs for relocation of patients, maintenance of temporary management or receivership to operate a facility pending correction of a violation, and for reimbursement to residents or patients of lost personal funds.

In addition to the remedies provided in §

32.1-27

and the civil penalties set forth in subsection A of this section, the Commissioner may petition the circuit court for the jurisdiction in which any nursing home or certified nursing facility as defined in §

32.1-123

is located for the appointment of a receiver in accordance with the provisions of this subsection whenever such nursing home or certified nursing facility shall (i) receive official notice from the Commissioner that its license has been or will be revoked or suspended, or that its Medicare or Medicaid certification has been or will be cancelled or revoked; or (ii) receive official notice from the United States Department of Health and Human Services or the Department of Medical Assistance Services that its provider agreement has been or will be revoked, cancelled, terminated or not renewed; or (iii) advise the Department of its intention to close or not to renew its license or Medicare or Medicaid provider agreement less than ninety days in advance; or (iv) operate at any time under conditions which present a major and continuing threat to the health, safety, security, rights or welfare of the patients, including the threat of imminent abandonment by the owner or operator, or a pattern of failure to meet ongoing financial obligations such as the inability to pay for essential food, pharmaceuticals, personnel, or required insurance; and (v) the Department is unable to make adequate and timely arrangements for relocating all patients who are receiving medical assistance under this chapter and Title XIX of the Social Security Act in order to ensure their continued safety and health care.Upon the filing of a petition for appointment of a receiver, the court shall hold a hearing within ten days, at which time the Department and the owner or operator of the facility may participate and present evidence. The court may grant the petition if it finds any one of the conditions identified in (i) through (iv) above to exist in combination with the condition identified in (v) and the court further finds that such conditions will not be remedied and that the patients will not be protected unless the petition is granted.No receivership established under this subsection shall continue in effect for more than 180 days without further order of the court, nor shall the receivership continue in effect following the revocation of the nursing home’s license or the termination of the certified nursing facility’s Medicare or Medicaid provider agreement, except to enforce any post-termination duties of the provider as required by the provisions of the Medicare or Medicaid provider agreement.The appointed receiver shall be a person licensed as nursing home administrator in the Commonwealth pursuant to Title 54.1 or, if not so licensed, shall employ and supervise a person so licensed to administer the day-to-day business of the nursing home or certified nursing facility.The receiver shall have (i) such powers and duties to manage the nursing home or certified nursing facility as the court may grant and direct, including but not limited to the duty to accomplish the orderly relocation of all patients and the right to refuse to admit new patients during the receivership, (ii) the power to receive, conserve, protect and disburse funds, including Medicare and Medicaid payments on behalf of the owner or operator of the nursing home or certified nursing facility, (iii) the power to execute and avoid executory contracts, (iv) the power to hire and discharge employees, and (v) the power to do all other acts, including the filing of such reports as the court may direct, subject to accounting to the court therefor and otherwise consistent with state and federal law, necessary to protect the patients from the threat or threats set forth in the original petitions, as well as such other threats arising thereafter or out of the same conditions.The court may grant injunctive relief as it deems appropriate to the Department or to its receiver either in conjunction with or subsequent to the granting of a petition for appointment of a receiver under this section.The court may terminate the receivership on the motion of the Department, the receiver, or the owner or operator, upon finding, after a hearing, that either (i) the conditions described in the petition have been substantially eliminated or remedied, or (ii) all patients in the nursing home or certified nursing facility have been relocated. Within thirty days after such termination, the receiver shall file a complete report of his activities with the court, including an accounting for all property of which he has taken possession and all funds collected.All costs of administration of a receivership hereunder shall be paid by the receiver out of reimbursement to the nursing home or certified nursing facility from Medicare, Medicaid and other patient care collections. The court, after terminating such receivership, shall enter appropriate orders to ensure such payments upon its approval of the receiver’s reports.A receiver appointed under this section shall be an officer of the court, shall not be liable for conditions at the nursing home or certified nursing facility which existed or originated prior to his appointment and shall not be personally liable, except for his own gross negligence and intentional acts which result in injuries to persons or damage to property at the nursing home or certified nursing facility during his receivership.The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to relieve any owner, operator or other party of any duty imposed by law or of any civil or criminal liability incurred by reason of any act or omission of such owner, operator, or other party.

History.

1989, c. 618; 1996, cc. 788, 797.

Editor’s note.

For Title XIX of the Social Security Act, referred to above, see generally, 42 U.S.C.S. § 1396.

§ 32.1-28.
When Attorney General to represent Board; special counsel.

The Attorney General shall represent the Board and Commissioner in all actions and proceedings for the enforcement of regulations or orders of the Board or Commissioner or the provisions of this title except actions or proceedings to which the Commonwealth or any of its agencies or institutions is a party defendant. Upon approval by the Governor, the Board is authorized to employ special counsel in such actions or proceedings.

History.

1979, c. 711.

§ 32.1-29.
Employment of attorney to defend Board members, employee, etc.

If the Commissioner, any Board member or any officer or employee of the Department is arrested, indicted or otherwise prosecuted on any criminal charge arising out of any act committed in the discharge of his duties as such, the Commissioner may employ an attorney approved by the Attorney General to defend such person. The compensation for such attorney shall, subject to the approval of the Attorney General, be paid out of the funds appropriated for the administration of the Department.

History.

1979, c. 711.